new_hnd_mo/without_Z_apertium_hn.dix
<pardef n="k/oI__p">
<e><p><l>isIne</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIne</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIko</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIko</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIse</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIse</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>isIke_liye</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIke_liye</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIke_xvArA</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIke_xvArA</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>



<e><p><l>isImeM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isImeM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIpara</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>isIpara</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhoMne</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhoMne</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMko</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMko</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMse</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMse</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>inhIMke_liye</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMke_liye</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMke_xvArA</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMke_xvArA</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>inhIMmeM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMmeM</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMpara</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inhIMpara</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oI</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oI</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oI</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oI</l><r>oI<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="koI"><i>k</i><par n="k/oI__p"/></e>
